Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5806
Approved advertising.

A third-party administrator shall use only such advertising pertaining to the insurance business underwritten by an insurer as has been approved in writing by the insurer in advance of its use.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 81.